Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,167
Effect of merger or share exchange.

(MBCA 11.07) (a) When a merger
becomes effective:

(1) The corporation or eligible
entity that is designated in the plan of merger as the survivor continues
or comes into existence, as the case may be;

(2) The separate existence of every
corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor ceases;

(3) All property owned by
and every contract right possessed by each corporation or eligible entity
that merges into the survivor is vested in the survivor without reversion
or impairment;

(4)
All liabilities of each corporation or eligible entity that is merged into
the survivor are vested in the survivor;

(5) The name of the survivor may, but need not be,
substituted in any pending proceeding for the name of any party to the merger
whose separate existence ceased in the merger;

(6) The articles of incorporation or
organic documents of the survivor are amended to the extent provided in the
plan of merger;

(7)
The articles of incorporation or organic documents of a survivor that is created
by the merger become effective; and

(8) The shares of each corporation that is a party
to the merger and the interests in an eligible entity that is a party to a
merger that are to be converted under the plan of merger into shares, eligible
interests, obligations, rights to acquire securities, other securities, or
eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing,
are converted, and the former holders of such shares or eligible interests
are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of merger or
to any rights they may have under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183 or the organic
law of the eligible entity.

(b)
When a share exchange becomes effective, the shares of each domestic corporation
that are to be exchanged for shares or other securities, interests, obligations,
rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any
combination of the foregoing are entitled only to the rights provided to them
in the plan of share exchange or to any rights they may have under sections
21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(c)
A person who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts,
obligations, or liabilities of any entity as a result of a merger or share
exchange shall have owner liability only to the extent provided in the organic
law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and liabilities that
arise after the effective time of the articles of merger or share exchange.

(d) Upon a merger becoming
effective, a foreign corporation or a foreign eligible entity that is the
survivor of the merger is deemed to agree that it will promptly pay the amount,
if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under sections 21-2,171 to
21-2,183.

(e)
The effect of a merger or share exchange on the owner liability of a person
who had owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities
of a party to the merger or share exchange shall be as follows:

(1) The merger or share exchange
does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law of the entity
in which the person was a shareholder or interest holder to the extent any
such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of merger
or share exchange;

(2)
The person shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the entity
in which the person was a shareholder or interest holder prior to the merger
or share exchange for any debt, obligation, or liability that arises after
the effective time of the articles of merger or share exchange;

(3) The provisions of the
organic law of any entity for which the person had owner liability before
the merger or share exchange shall continue to apply to the collection or
discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (1) of this subsection
as if the merger or share exchange had not occurred; and

(4) The person shall have
whatever rights of contribution from other persons provided by the organic
law of the entity for which the person had owner liability with respect to
any owner liability preserved by subdivision (1) of this subsection as if
the merger or share exchange had not occurred.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 167.
January 1, 2017